Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1
G

ENERAL PROVISIONS

12-8-20. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Comprehensive Solid Waste Management Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-8-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1.)

Law reviews.

-
For annual survey on local government law, see 42 Mercer L. Rev. 359 (1990). For summary review article on zoning and land use law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2008).

12-8-21. Declaration of policy; legislative intent.

It is declared to be the policy of the State of Georgia, in furtherance of its responsibility to protect the public health, safety, and well-being of its citizens and to protect and enhance the quality of its environment, to institute and maintain a comprehensive state-wide program for solid waste management and to prevent and abate litter, so as to assure that solid waste does not adversely affect the health, safety, and well-being of the public and that solid waste facilities, whether publicly or privately owned, do not degrade the quality of the environment by reason of their location, design, method of operation, or other means and which, to the extent feasible and practical, makes maximum utilization of the resources contained in solid waste.

It is further declared to be the policy of the State of Georgia to educate and encourage generators and handlers of solid waste to reduce and minimize to the greatest extent possible the amount of solid waste which requires collection, treatment, or disposal through source reduction, reuse, composting, recycling, and other methods and to promote markets for and engage in the purchase of goods made from recovered materials and goods which are recyclable.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that every effort be undertaken to reduce on a state-wide per capita basis the amount of municipal solid waste being received at disposal facilities.

It is further the intent of the General Assembly that the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources shall be the official charged with primary responsibility for the solid waste management program. The director, in exercising any authority granted in this part, shall conform to and implement the policies outlined in this part and shall at all times coordinate his activities with those of other state agencies and local political jurisdictions so as to achieve a unified and effective solid waste management program in the state.

It is further intended by the General Assembly that the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources shall, in exercising any authority granted in this part, recognize that the states which share common borders with Georgia also share the vital natural resources of clean air, clean surface waters, and clean ground waters which flow across those common borders and that, therefore, those bordering states have a mutual interest with Georgia to manage solid waste in a manner that does not threaten to contaminate the shared natural resources. The director shall also recognize, however, that such mutual interest may not exist between Georgia and states which do not share common borders and natural resources with it. Therefore, the director is instructed to be particularly mindful of the need to monitor, inspect, and regulate closely that solid waste generated from sources located in states not sharing common borders and natural resources with Georgia.

It is further the intent of the General Assembly that every effort be undertaken to ensure the proper management of scrap tires from the point of generation to the ultimate point of reuse, recycling, or disposal and that every effort be made to ensure that, where possible, they be reused or recycled rather than being disposed.

It is further the intent of the General Assembly to provide a frame of reference for this state and all counties, municipal corporations, and solid waste management authorities in this state relating to the handling of yard trimmings. It is also the intent of the General Assembly to encourage beneficial reuse of yard trimmings and other vegetative matter by composting and other methods of recycling and return of such vegetative matter to the soil and by reuse of yard trimmings to promote bioenergy and renewable energy goals. The General Assembly, therefore, adopts and recommends the following hierarchy for handling yard trimmings:

Naturalized, low-maintenance landscaping requiring little or no cutting;

Grass cycling by mowing it high and letting it lie;

Return to the soil or other beneficial reuse on the site where the material was grown, including but not limited to:

Stacking branches into brush piles for use as wildlife habitats and for gradual decomposition into the soil;

Composting on the site where the material was grown, followed by incorporation of the finished compost into the soil at that site; or

Chipping woody material on the site where such material was generated; and

Collecting yard trimmings and transporting them to another site to be:

Processed for mulch or feedstock for composting;

Processed for use as a bioenergy feedstock; or

Disposed in a lined landfill having a permitted gas collection system in operation by which landfill gas is directed to equipment or facilities for beneficial reuse such as electrical power generation, industrial end use, or other beneficial use promoting renewable energy goals.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3259, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 399, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1247, §§ 1, 2/SB 122; Ga. L. 2011, p. 283, § 1/HB 274.)

Law reviews.

-
For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 165 (2011). For article, "Conservation and Natural Resources:
Waste Management," see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 165 (2011).

12-8-22. Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

"Affected county" means, in addition to the county in which a facility is or is proposed to be located, each county contiguous to the host county and each county and municipality within a county that has a written agreement with the facility to dispose of solid waste.

(1.1) "Biomedical waste" means pathological waste, biological waste cultures and stocks of infectious agents and associated biologicals, contaminated animal carcasses (body parts, their bedding, and other wastes from such animals), sharps, chemotherapy waste, discarded medical equipment and parts, not including expendable supplies and materials which have not been decontaminated, as further defined in Rule 391-3-4-.15 of the board as such rule existed on January 1, 2006, and other such waste materials.

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources of the State of Georgia.

"Certificate" means a document issued by a college or university of the University System of Georgia or other organization approved by the director stating that the operator has met the requirements of the board for the specified operator classification of the certification program.

"Closure" means a procedure approved by the division which provides for the cessation of waste receipt at a solid waste disposal site and for the securing of the site in preparation for postclosure.

(4.1) "Commercial solid waste" means all types of solid waste generated by stores, offices, restaurants, warehouses, and other nonmanufacturing activities, excluding residential and industrial wastes.

"Composting" means the controlled biological decomposition of organic matter into a stable, odor-free humus.

(5.1) "Construction or demolition waste" means waste building materials and rubble resulting from construction, remodeling, repair, or demolition operations on pavements, houses, commercial buildings, and other structures. Such waste includes but is not limited to waste containing asbestos, wood, bricks, metal, concrete, wallboard, paper, cardboard, and other nonputrescible wastes associated with construction and demolition activities which have a low potential for ground-water contamination. Inert waste landfill materials approved by the board for disposal in landfills permitted by rule and regulation are also included in this definition if disposed in a construction or demolition waste landfill.

"Contaminant" means any physical, chemical, biological, or radiological substance or matter.

"Director" means the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Disposal facility" means any facility or location where the final deposition of solid waste occurs and includes but is not limited to landfilling and solid waste thermal treatment technology facilities.

"Division" means the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

(9.1) "Feedstock" means raw material that is used in a machine or industrial process.

"Financial responsibility mechanism" means a mechanism designed to demonstrate that sufficient funds will be available to meet specific environmental protection needs of solid waste handling facilities. Available financial responsibility mechanisms include but are not limited to insurance, trust funds, surety bonds, letters of credit, personal bonds, certificates of deposit, financial tests, and corporate guarantees as defined in 40 C.F.R. Part 264 Subpart H - Financial Requirements.

(10.1) "Gasification to fuels and chemicals" means a process through which recovered materials or other nonrecycled feedstock is heated and converted into a fuel-gas mixture in an oxygen-deficient atmosphere, and such mixture is converted into fuel, including ethanol and transportation fuel, chemicals, or other chemical feedstocks.

(10.2) "Gasification to fuels and chemicals facility" means a facility that collects, separates, stores, or converts nonrecycled feedstock into fuels, chemicals, or other valuable final or intermediate products using a gasification to fuels and chemicals process. Such term shall not include a waste handling facility or solid waste thermal treatment facility.

"Generator" means any person in Georgia or in any other state who creates solid waste.

"Hazardous constituent" means any substance listed as a hazardous constituent in regulations promulgated pursuant to the federal act by the administrator of the United States Environmental Protection Agency which are in force and effect on February 1, 2004, codified as Appendix VIII to 40 C.F.R. Part 261 - Identification and Listing of Hazardous Waste.

(12.1) "Industrial solid waste" means solid waste generated by manufacturing or industrial processes or operations that is not a hazardous waste regulated under Part 1 of Article 3 of this chapter, the "Georgia Hazardous Waste Management Act." Such waste includes, but is not limited to, waste resulting from the following manufacturing processes:
Electric power generation; fertilizer and agricultural chemicals; food and related products and by-products; inorganic chemicals; iron and steel products; leather and leather products; nonferrous metal and foundry products; organic chemicals; plastics and resins; pulp and paper; rubber and miscellaneous plastic products; stone, glass, clay, and concrete products; textiles; transportation equipment; and water treatment.
This term does not include mining waste or oil and gas waste.

"Label" means a code label described in paragraphs (3) and (4) of subsection (b) of Code Section 12-8-34.

"Landfill" means an area of land on which or an excavation in which solid waste is placed for permanent disposal and which is not a land application unit, surface impoundment, injection well, or compost pile.

"Leachate collection system" means a system at a landfill for collection of the leachate which may percolate through the waste and into the soils surrounding the landfill.

(15.1) "Litter" has the meaning provided by Code Section 16-7-42.

"Manifest" means a form or document used for identifying the quantity and composition and the origin, routing, and destination of special solid waste during its transportation from the point of generation, through any intermediate points, to the point of disposal, treatment, or storage.

"Materials recovery facility" means a solid waste handling facility that provides for the extraction from solid waste of recoverable materials, materials suitable for use as a fuel or soil amendment, or any combination of such materials.

(17.1) "Multijurisdictional solid waste management plan" means a comprehensive solid waste plan adopted pursuant to Code Section 12-8-31.1 covering two or more jurisdictions.

"Municipal solid waste" means any solid waste derived from households, including garbage, trash, and sanitary waste in septic tanks and means solid waste from single-family and multifamily residences, hotels and motels, bunkhouses, campgrounds, picnic grounds, and day use recreation areas. The term includes yard trimmings, construction or demolition waste, and commercial solid waste but does not include solid waste from mining, agricultural, or silvicultural operations or industrial processes or operations.

"Municipal solid waste disposal facility" means any facility or location where the final deposition of any amount of municipal solid waste occurs, whether or not mixed with or including commercial or industrial solid waste, and includes, but is not limited to, municipal solid waste landfills and municipal solid waste thermal treatment technology facilities.

"Municipal solid waste landfill" means a disposal facility where any amount of municipal solid waste, whether or not mixed with or including commercial waste, industrial waste, nonhazardous sludges, or small quantity generator hazardous waste, is disposed of by means of placing an approved cover thereon.

(20.1) "Nonrecycled feedstock" means one or more of the following materials, derived from nonrecycled materials, that has been processed so that it may be used as a feedstock in a gasification to fuels and chemicals facility, but excluding coal refuse and scrap tires:

Post-use plastics; or

Materials for which the Environmental Protection Agency has made a nonwaste determination under 40 C.F.R. Section 241.3(c) or that are otherwise determined not to constitute waste.

"Operator" means the person stationed on the site who is in responsible charge of and has direct supervision of daily field operations of a municipal solid waste disposal facility to ensure that the facility operates in compliance with the permit.

"Person" means the State of Georgia or any other state or any agency or institution thereof and any municipality, county, political subdivision, public or private corporation, solid waste authority, special district empowered to engage in solid waste management activities, individual, partnership, association, or other entity in Georgia or any other state. This term also includes any officer or governing or managing body of any municipality, political subdivision, solid waste authority, special district empowered to engage in solid waste management activities, or public or private corporation in Georgia or any other state. This term also includes employees, departments, and agencies of the federal government.

(22.1) "Post-use plastics" means recovered plastics, derived from any source, that are not being used for their originally intended purpose and that might otherwise become waste if not processed at a pyrolysis or gasification to fuels and chemicals facility or recycled, and the term includes plastics that may contain incidental contaminants or impurities such as paper labels or metal rings.

"Postclosure" means a procedure approved by the division to provide for long-term financial assurance, monitoring, and maintenance of a solid waste disposal site to protect human health and the environment.

"Private industry solid waste disposal facility" means a disposal facility which is operated exclusively by and for a private solid waste generator for the purpose of accepting solid waste generated exclusively by said private solid waste generator.

(24.1) "Pyrolysis" means a process through which post-use plastics are heated, in an oxygen-free environment, until melted and thermally decomposed, then cooled, condensed, and converted into oil, diesel, gasoline, home heating oil, or other liquid fuel; gasoline or diesel blendstock; chemicals or chemical feedstock; waxes or lubricants; or other similar raw materials or intermediate or final products.

(24.2) "Pyrolysis facility" means a facility that collects, separates, stores, or converts post-use plastics into fuels or other valuable final or intermediate products using a pyrolysis process. Pyrolysis facilities shall not be considered solid waste handling facilities or solid waste thermal treatment facilities.

"Recovered materials" means those materials which have known use, reuse, or recycling potential; can be feasibly used, reused, or recycled; and have been diverted or removed from the solid waste stream for sale, use, reuse, or recycling, whether or not requiring subsequent separation and processing.

"Recovered materials processing facility" means a facility engaged solely in the storage, processing, recycling, and resale or reuse of recovered materials. Such facility shall not be considered a solid waste handling facility; provided, however, that any solid waste generated by such facility shall be subject to all applicable laws and regulations relating to such solid waste.

"Recycling" means any process by which materials which would otherwise become solid waste are collected, separated, or processed and reused or returned to use in the form of raw materials, intermediates, or products which can be used as a substitute for products not derived by such processes.

(27.1) "Regional landfill or regional solid waste disposal facility" means a facility owned by a county, municipality, authority, or special district empowered to engage in solid waste management activities, or any combination thereof, which serves two or more or any combination of counties, municipalities, or special solid waste districts.

(27.2) "Regional solid waste management plan" means a comprehensive solid waste plan adopted pursuant to Code Section 12-8-31.1 covering two or more counties and may include one or more municipal corporations within those counties.

"Retreadable casing" means a scrap tire suitable for retreading.

"Rigid plastic bottle" means any rigid plastic container with a neck that is smaller than the container body with a capacity of 16 ounces or more and less than five gallons.

"Rigid plastic container" means any formed or molded part comprised predominantly of plastic resin, having a relatively inflexible finite shape or form, and intended primarily as a single-service container with a capacity of eight ounces or more and less than five gallons.

"Scrap tire" means a tire that is no longer suitable for its original intended purpose because of wear, damage, or defect.

Reserved.

"Solid waste" means any garbage or refuse; sludge from a waste-water treatment plant, water supply treatment plant, or air pollution control facility; and other discarded material including solid, semisolid, or contained gaseous material resulting from industrial, commercial, mining, and agricultural operations and community activities, but does not include recovered materials; post-use plastics and nonrecycled feedstock that are subsequently processed using a pyrolysis or gasification to fuels and chemicals process; solid or dissolved materials in domestic sewage; solid or dissolved materials in irrigation return flows or industrial discharges that are point sources subject to permit under 33 U.S.C. Section 1342; or source, special nuclear, or by-product material as defined by the federal Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (68 Stat. 923).

"Solid waste handling" means the storage, collection, transportation, treatment, utilization, processing, or disposal of solid waste or any combination of such activities, but does not include recovered materials processing or pyrolysis or gasification to fuels and chemicals processes, or the holding of post-use plastics or nonrecycled feedstock at a pyrolysis facility or gasification to fuels and chemicals facility prior to processing at the facility where those materials are being held to ensure production is not interrupted.

"Solid waste handling facility" means any facility the primary purpose of which is the storage, collection, transportation, treatment, utilization, processing, or disposal, or any combination thereof, of solid waste, but does not include recovered materials processing facilities or pyrolysis or gasification to fuels and chemicals facilities.

"Solid waste thermal treatment technology" means any solid waste handling facility the purpose of which is to reduce the amount of solid waste to be disposed of through a process of combustion, with or without the process of waste to energy.

"Special solid waste" means any solid waste not otherwise regulated under Part 1 of Article 3 of this chapter, known as the "Georgia Hazardous Waste Management Act," and regulations promulgated under such part originating or produced from or by a source or generator not subject to regulation under Code Section 12-8-24.

"Tire" means a continuous solid or pneumatic rubber covering designed for encircling the wheel of a motor vehicle and which is neither attached to the motor vehicle nor a part of the motor vehicle as original equipment.

(38.1) "Tire carrier" means any person engaged in collecting or transporting tires, other than new tires.

"Tire retailer" means any person, other than a used motor vehicle parts dealer licensed in accordance with Chapter 47 of Title 43, engaged in the business of selling new replacement tires or used tires.

"Tire retreader" means any person actively engaged in the business of retreading scrap tires by scarifying the surface to remove the old surface tread and attaching a new tread to make a usable tire.

(40.1) "Used tire" means a tire which has a minimum of 2/32 inch of road tread and which is still suitable for its original purpose but is no longer new. A tire retailer shall inventory and market used tires in substantially the same fashion as a new tire and be able to provide satisfactory evidence to the division that a market for the tire exists and the tire is in fact being marketed as a used tire. A used tire shall not be considered solid waste.

"Waste to energy facility" means a solid waste handling facility that provides for the extraction and utilization of energy from municipal solid waste through a process of combustion.

"Yard trimmings" means leaves, brush, grass clippings, shrub and tree prunings, discarded Christmas trees, nursery and greenhouse vegetative residuals, and vegetative matter resulting from landscaping development and maintenance other than mining, agricultural, and silvicultural operations.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-22

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3259, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3276, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 12; Ga. L. 1993, p. 399, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1247, §§ 3-6/SB 122; Ga. L. 2006, p. 275, § 3-1/HB 1320; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 12/HB 942; Ga. L. 2013, p. 274, § 1/HB 226; Ga. L. 2018, p. 760, § 1/HB 785.)

Cross references.

- Disposal of diseased, disabled, or dead animals generally, T. 4, C. 5.

Abandonment of dead dogs,

§§

4-8-1.1

,

4-8-2

.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "semisolid" was substituted for "semi-solid" in paragraph (33).

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2006, p. 275,

§

1-1/HB 1320, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall be known and may be cited as the 'Comprehensive Litter Prevention and Abatement Act of 2006.'"

Ga. L. 2006, p. 275,

§

5-1/HB 1320, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the Act shall become effective April 21, 2006, for purposes of adopting local ordinances to become effective on or after July 1, 2006.

U.S. Code.

- The Federal Water Pollution Control Act or the Clean Water Act, referred to in paragraph (33) of this Code section, is codified at 33 U.S.C.

§

1342.

Law reviews.

-
For article, "Conservation and Natural Resources:
Waste Management," see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 165 (2011). For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 69 Mercer L. Rev. 371 (2017).
For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 199 (1992).

12-8-23. Powers and duties of board.

In the performance of its duties the board shall have and may exercise the power to:

Adopt, promulgate, modify, amend, and repeal rules and regulations to implement and enforce the provisions of this part as the board may deem necessary to provide for the control and management of solid waste to protect the environment and the health of humans. Such rules and regulations may be applicable to the state as a whole or may vary from area to area or may vary by waste characteristics, as may be appropriate to facilitate the accomplishment of the provisions, purposes, and policies of this part. The rules and regulations may include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

Rules and regulations governing and controlling solid waste handling, including measures to ensure that solid waste management practices are regulated, governed, and controlled in the public interest;

Rules and regulations prescribing the procedure to be followed in applying for permits and requiring the submission of such plans, specifications, verifications, and other pertinent information deemed relevant in connection with the issuance of such permits;

Rules and regulations concerning the establishment of permits by rule;

Rules and regulations establishing the use of a manifest during the generation and handling of special solid waste;

Rules and regulations governing and controlling the handling of special solid waste and biomedical waste;

Rules and regulations establishing criteria and a system of priorities for the distribution of any state funds as may be made available through a grant-in-aid program to assist financially local governmental agencies or authorities in the planning, implementing, maintaining, or operating of solid waste handling systems which are consistent with local and regional solid waste management plans;

Rules and regulations establishing procedures and requirements for the postclosure care of all solid waste disposal facilities, including but not limited to corrective action of releases, ground-water monitoring, and maintenance of final cover;

Rules and regulations establishing the criteria for approval, time periods for coverage, and other terms and conditions for the demonstration of financial responsibility required by this part and for the implementation of financial responsibility instruments;

Rules and regulations establishing qualifications for municipal solid waste disposal facility operators and certification of such operators through colleges or universities of the University System of Georgia or other organizations as may be determined acceptable by the board;

Rules and regulations regulating the generation, collection, processing, and disposal of scrap tires and the collection, inventory, and marketing of used tires and governing the investigation and cleanup of sites where scrap tires have been disposed regardless of the date when such disposal occurred; and

Rules and regulations further defining what shall or shall not constitute "recovered materials"; and

Take all necessary steps to ensure the effective enforcement of this part.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-23

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3259, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3276, § 2; Ga. L. 2013, p. 274, § 2/HB 226.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, "and" was deleted at the end of subparagraph (1)(I) and the subparagraph (1)(J) added by the second 1992 amendment was redesignated as subparagraph (1)(K) and "; and" was substituted for a period at the end thereof.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Solid waste management, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Subject 391-3-4.

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 199 (1992).

12-8-23.1. Powers and duties of director.

The director shall have and may exercise the following powers and duties:

To exercise general supervision over the administration and enforcement of this part and all rules and regulations, orders, or permits promulgated or issued under this part;

To encourage, participate in, or conduct studies, reviews, investigations, research, and demonstrations relating to solid waste management practices as he deems advisable and necessary;

To issue all permits contemplated by this part, stipulating in each permit the conditions or limitations under which such permit is to be issued, and to deny, revoke, transfer, modify, suspend, or amend such permits.

To refuse to grant such permit if the director finds by clear and convincing evidence that the applicant for a permit or, in the case of a corporation, partnership, or association, an officer, director, manager, or shareholder of 5 percent or more of stock or financial interest in said corporation, partnership, or association:

Has intentionally misrepresented or concealed any material fact in the application submitted to the director;

Has obtained or attempted to obtain the permit by misrepresentation or concealment;

Has been convicted by final judgment, and all appeals have been exhausted, in the State of Georgia or any federal court of any felony involving moral turpitude within the three years immediately preceding the application for a permit;

Has been convicted of any violations of any environmental laws punishable as a felony in any state or federal court within the five years preceding the application for a permit;

Has knowingly, willfully, and consistently violated the prohibitions specified in Code Section 12-8-30.7; or

Has been adjudicated in contempt of any court order enforcing any federal environmental laws or any environmental laws of the State of Georgia within the five years preceding the application for a permit;

To make investigations, analyses, and inspections to determine and ensure compliance with this part, the rules and regulations promulgated under this part, and any permits or orders which the director may issue;

To enter into such contracts as may be required or necessary to effectuate this part or the rules and regulations promulgated under this part;

To prepare, develop, amend, modify, submit, and implement any comprehensive plan or program sufficient to comply with this part or any applicable federal act, or both, for the control, regulation, and monitoring of solid waste management practices in this state and to enforce such plan or program;

To advise, consult, cooperate, and contract on solid waste management matters with other agencies of this state, political subdivisions of this state, and other designated organizations, authorities, or entities and, with the approval of the Governor, to negotiate and enter into agreements with the governments of other states and the United States and their several agencies, subdivisions, or designated organizations or entities;

To issue, amend, modify, or revoke orders as may be necessary to ensure and enforce compliance with this part and all rules or regulations promulgated under this part;

To institute, in the name of the division, proceedings of mandamus, injunction, or other proper administrative, civil, or criminal proceedings to enforce this part, the rules and regulations promulgated under this part, or any orders or permits issued under this part;

To accept, receive, administer, and disburse grants from public or private sources for the purpose of the proper administration of this part or for the purpose of carrying out any of the duties, powers, or responsibilities under this part;

To grant variances in accordance with this part and the rules and regulations promulgated under this part, provided that such variances are not inconsistent with any applicable federal act and rules or regulations promulgated under such federal act;

To require any person who is engaged in solid waste handling subject to the permit by rule provisions of this part to notify the division in writing, within a reasonable number of days which the director shall specify, of the location and general description of such activity, identify the solid waste handled, and give any other information which may be deemed relevant, under such conditions as the director may prescribe;

To render technical assistance to state, regional, and local governments and others in the planning and operation of solid waste handling;

To develop criteria and a system of priorities for the distribution of any state funds as may be available through a state grant-in-aid program to assist financially local governments and authorities in the planning, implementing, maintaining, or operating of solid waste handling systems which are consistent with local and regional solid waste management plans prepared in accordance with the requirements of this part;

To approve or disapprove projects for which loans or grants are made under any state or federal act to any municipality, county, authority, or agency of the state for the purpose of solid waste handling; provided, however, the financial review and approval or disapproval for a loan will be made by the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority;

To develop environmental standards for solid waste management planning to assist local governments, authorities, and corporations in the preparation of local and regional plans prepared in accordance with the requirements of this part;

To advise and consult, cooperate, and contract with other agencies of this state, authorities, political subdivisions of this state, and other designated agencies, entities, persons, and corporations and with the governments of other states and the United States and their several agencies, subdivisions, or designated organizations and entities on matters concerning educating the public on all aspects of proper solid waste management;

To collect and disburse all fees and funds authorized or imposed by this article;

To collect fees related to the sale of new replacement tires and with such fees administer such programs as may be necessary to ensure that scrap tires are regulated from the point of generation to the point of ultimate disposal to protect public health and the environment; and

To exercise all incidental powers necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.

The powers and duties described in subsection (a) of this Code section may be exercised and performed by the director through such duly authorized agents and employees as he deems necessary and proper.

(Code 1981, §

12-8-23.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 412, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1222, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234, § 3; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3259, § 4; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3276, § 3; Ga. L. 2010, p. 949, § 1/HB 244.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, former paragraph (a)(18), which was redesignated as paragraph (a)(19) by Ga. L. 1992, p. 2234,

§

3, was redesignated as paragraph (a)(20).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, in subsection (a), "and" was deleted at the end of paragraph (18) and "; and" was added at the end of paragraph (19).

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1992 amendment of this Code section, see 9 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 199 (1992).